Wyoming, session 2025, HB0219.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 36-9-121 is created to read:
36-9-121. County and municipal roads on state lands;
easements granted; duties.
(a) As used in this section:
(i) "County road" means a road that is
established pursuant to W.S. 24-3-101 through 24-3-127,
identified pursuant to W.S. 24-3-201 through 24-3-206 or a
road for which the county is responsible for improvements
and maintenance as designated by resolution of a board of
county commissioners;
(ii) "Municipal road" means a road that is
established by a city or town and for which the city or
town is responsible for improvements and maintenance.
(b) Subject to subsection (h) of this section, a
perpetual easement for a right-of-way over and across any
state or school lands is hereby granted for county roads
and municipal roads that go over and across any state or
school lands and that were established before January 1,
2025.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0219
ENROLLED ACT NO. 59, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(c) No fee, charge, assessment or other cost shall be
imposed on any county, city or user of a municipal road or
county road for the perpetual easement granted under
subsection (b) of this section.
(d) Not later than August 1, 2025, the director shall
provide to the board a listing of all county and municipal
roads that go on or across state lands or school lands and
all documents necessary for establishing or securing the
easements granted in subsection (b) of this section. The
director may request any documentation from counties,
cities and towns as necessary to secure the easements,
provided that the board shall be responsible for all costs
associated with the documentation required under this
subsection.
(e) Not later than October 31, 2025:
(i) The board shall promulgate or amend rules as
necessary to provide for the easements granted in
subsection (b) of this section;
(ii) The director, in consultation with the
board, shall provide a list of all county roads and
municipal roads for which the easements were granted under
subsection (b) of this section to all counties, cities and
towns.
(f) Not later than April 1, 2030, each county, city
and town that has a county road or municipal road for which
an easement has been granted under subsection (b) of this
section shall provide complete and proper documentation to
the director and the board as necessary to secure the
easement for the county or municipal road.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0219
ENROLLED ACT NO. 59, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(g) Not later than ninety (90) days after receiving
all necessary documentation to effectuate an easement under
subsection (f) of this section, the board shall provide
proper evidence of the easement granted under this section.
The board shall be responsible for recording or filing with
the county clerk all documents necessary to demonstrate the
granting of the easement under this section.
(h) All county roads and municipal roads constructed
or established on and after January 1, 2025 shall secure
easements or rights-of-way for roads going on and across
state or school lands in accordance with law and rules of
the board. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
grant an automatic easement for county roads and municipal
roads constructed or established on and after January 1,
2025.
Section 2. W.S. 36-1-101(a)(viii) is amended to read:
36-1-101. Definitions.
(a) Unless the context indicates otherwise, as used
in this act:
(viii) "This act" means W.S. 36-1-101 through
36-3-111, 36-5-101 through 36-7-510 and 36-9-101 through
36-9-120 36-9-121.
Section 3. The board of land commissioners shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0219
ENROLLED ACT NO. 59, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
4